Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4550.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5d. (1) A qualified organization may apply for an unlimited number of small and large raffle licenses. (2) Only 1 small raffle license may be issued for a location each day. (3) All drawing locations shall must be the same if a small raffle license is issued for more than 1 date. (4) If a drawing location is a school, a prize for a raffle must not be a firearm. As used in this subsection: (a) "Firearm" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421. (b) "School" means a public or private school, grades kindergarten through the twelfth grade, but does not include a home school. (5) (4) A qualified organization is excused from the requirements of obtaining a license under this act if the qualified organization is sponsoring a single gathering and conducts a raffle before which there is no presale of tickets and the total aggregate retail value of the prize or prizes to be awarded that day is $100.00 or less.